nl: Grille embleemvoorziening: Embleem inbegrepen; Geen embleemvoorziening (embleemloos); OEM-embleemhouder (hergebruikt OEM-embleem); Optionele embleemhouder; Overig
nb: Tilveiebringelse av grillemblem: Emblem inkludert; Ingen plass til emblem (uten emblem); OEM-emblemfeste (gjenbruker OEM-emblem); Valgfritt emblemfeste; Annet
pl: Miejsce na emblemat w grillu: Emblemat w zestawie; Brak miejsca na emblemat (bez emblematu); Mocowanie emblematu OEM (ponowne użycie emblematu OEM); Opcjonalne mocowanie emblematu; Inne
sv: Stöd för grillemblem: Emblem ingår; Utan emblem; OEM-emblemfäste (återanvänder OEM-emblem); Valfritt emblemfäste; Övrigt
es: Disposición del emblema de la parrilla: Emblema incluido; Sin espacio para emblema (sin marca); Soporte de emblema OEM (reutiliza el emblema OEM); Soporte de emblema opcional; Otro
pt-BR: Grade provisão para emblema: Emblema incluído; Sem emblema (debadged); Suporte para emblema OEM (reutiliza emblema OEM); Suporte de emblema opcional; Outro
en: Grille emblem provision: Emblem included; No emblem provision (debadged); OEM emblem mount (reuses OEM emblem); Optional emblem mount; Other
zh-TW: 水箱護罩徽標預留設計: 包含標誌; 無標誌 (無車標); OEM 標誌底座 (重複使用 OEM 標誌); 選配標誌底座; 其他
fi: Säleikön tunnuksen varustaminen: Sisältää embleemin; Ei embleemivalmiutta (merkki poistettu); OEM-embleemin kiinnitys (käyttää OEM-embleemiä); Valinnainen embleemin kiinnitys; Muu
fr: Prédisposition pour emblème de calandre: Emblème inclus; Sans emplacement pour emblème (désiglé); Support d’emblème d’origine (réutilise l’emblème d’origine); Support d’emblème en option; Autre
lt-LT: Grotelių emblemos palaikymas: Emblema pridedama; Be emblemos; OEM emblemos laikiklis (naudojama OEM emblema); Pasirenkamas emblemos laikiklis; Kita
ro-RO: Prevedere emblemă grilă: Emblemă inclusă; Fără suport de emblemă (fără emblemă); Suport pentru emblemă OEM (reutilizează emblema OEM); Suport opțional pentru emblemă; Altele
da: Mulighed for emblem på frontgrill: Emblem medfølger; Ingen emblemklargøring (uden emblem); OEM-emblemmontering (genbruger OEM-emblem); Valgfri emblemmontering; Andet
el: Υποδοχή εμβλήματος μάσκας: Περιλαμβάνεται έμβλημα; Χωρίς υποδοχή εμβλήματος (debadged); Βάση εμβλήματος OEM (επαναχρησιμοποίηση εμβλήματος OEM); Προαιρετική βάση εμβλήματος; Άλλο
tr: Izgara amblemi temini: Amblem dahil; Amblem yeri yok (amblemsiz); OEM amblem montajı (OEM amblemini yeniden kullanır); İsteğe bağlı amblem montajı; Diğer
zh-CN: 格栅徽章安装位: 包含车标; 无车标预留（无标）; OEM 车标支架（重复使用 OEM 车标）; 可选车标支架; 其他
th: ช่องสำหรับติดตราสัญลักษณ์กระจังหน้า: มีตราสัญลักษณ์; ไม่มีตราสัญลักษณ์ (เอาตราออก); เมาท์ตราสัญลักษณ์ OEM (ใช้ตราสัญลักษณ์ OEM ซ้ำ); เมาท์ตราสัญลักษณ์เสริม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Odredba o amblemu rešetke: Uključen amblem; Bez predviđenog mjesta za amblem (bez amblema); Nosač OEM amblema (ponovno koristi OEM amblem); Opcijski nosač amblema; Ostalo
cs: Ustanovení o emblému mřížky: Včetně znaku; Bez přípravy pro znak (odstraněný znak); Držák pro OEM znak (využívá původní znak); Volitelný držák znaku; Ostatní
hu: Hűtőrács embléma biztosítása: Embléma mellékelve; Nincs emblémahely (jeltelenített); Gyári emblématartó (gyári emblémát használja); Opcionális emblématartó; Egyéb
bg-BG: Наличие на емблема върху решетката: Включена емблема; Без място за емблема (изчистена); Оригинален монтаж на емблемата (използва отново OEM емблемата); Опционален монтаж на емблемата; Друго
vi: Điều khoản về biểu tượng lưới tản nhiệt: Kèm logo; Không có chỗ gắn logo (bỏ logo); Gá lắp logo OEM (tái sử dụng logo OEM); Giá lắp logo tùy chọn; Khác
sk-SK: Priestor na emblém na mriežke: Znak je súčasťou balenia; Bez prípravy na znak (bez znaku); OEM držiak na znak (využíva OEM znak); Voliteľný držiak na znak; Iné
ko: 그릴 엠블럼 지원 여부: 엠블럼 포함; 엠블럼 장착부 없음(디배징); OEM 엠블럼 마운트(OEM 엠블럼 재사용); 옵션 엠블럼 마운트; 기타
ja: グリルエンブレム取り付け部: エンブレム付き; エンブレム用のスペースなし (バッジなし); OEMエンブレムマウント (OEMエンブレムを再利用); オプションのエンブレムマウント; その他
pt-PT: Fornecimento de emblema da grelha: Emblema incluído; Sem emblema (sem logótipo); Suporte de emblema OEM (reutiliza emblema OEM); Suporte de emblema opcional; Outro
ru: Совместимость решетки радиатора с эмблемой: С эмблемой; Без места под эмблему; Крепление для оригинальной эмблемы (используется штатная эмблема); Дополнительное крепление для эмблемы; Другое
sl-SI: Nastavek za emblem na maski: Znak je vključen; Brez prostora za znak (brez oznak); Nastavek za znak OEM (ponovna uporaba znaka OEM); Izbirni nastavek za znak; Drugo
de: Vorrichtung für das Kühlergrillemblem: Emblem inklusive; Keine Emblem-Vorrichtung (ohne Logo); OEM-Emblem-Halterung (verwendet OEM-Emblem wieder); Optionale Emblem-Halterung; Sonstige
it: fornitura dell'emblema della griglia: Stemma incluso; Nessuna predisposizione per stemma (senza logo); Supporto per stemma OEM (riutilizza stemma OEM); Supporto per stemma opzionale; Altro